Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
In General

§ 17-3-1.
Counties and municipalities may advertise resources.

The board of supervisors of any county in Mississippi, and the mayor and board of aldermen or board of commissioners of any municipality in the State of Mississippi, may in their discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys, not to exceed one mill of their respective valuation and assessment for the purpose of advertising and bringing into favorable notice the opportunities, possibilities and resources of such municipality or county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 284; 1942, § 2982; Laws, 1926, ch. 267.

§ 17-3-3.
Advertising, kind included, excluded.

Advertising pursuant to Section 17-3-1 shall include newspaper and magazine advertising and literature, publicity, expositions, public entertainment or other form of advertising or publicity, which in the judgment of such board or boards will be helpful toward advancing the moral, financial and other interests of such municipality or county; however, such advertising shall not include advertisements in publications sponsored by political parties, political committees or affiliated organizations, as such terms are defined in Section 23-15-801.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 285; 1942, § 2983; Laws, 1926, ch. 267; Laws, 2012, ch. 457, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 23, 2012.).

§ 17-3-5.
Boards may cooperate with statewide movement.

In the expenditure of funds as provided, in section 17-3-1, the said board or boards may cooperate with any statewide movement or any state organization in putting over a statewide campaign or program.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 286; 1942, § 2984; Laws, 1926, ch. 267.

§ 17-3-7.
Municipalities and counties authorized to make appropriations in aid of fairs.

All municipalities, regardless of the form of government under which they operate, or any board of supervisors, shall have the power to appropriate money, not exceeding Twenty-five Hundred Dollars ($2500.00), annually, to aid in the payment of premiums and awards made and given by fairs or fair associations located, held and operated in such county. Such appropriations may be made in gross amounts, and paid upon specific awards made under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the municipal or county authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 287; 1942, § 2985; Laws, 1926, ch. 270.

§ 17-3-9.
Definitions for Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19.

As used in Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19, unless the text otherwise requires:

“Municipality” means any county within the State of Mississippi which borders upon the Mississippi Gulf Coast and any city, town, supervisor’s district, or other political entity created by the state located in whole or in part in any county bordering upon the Mississippi Gulf Coast or any combination of any of the above; any class one county having an area in excess of seven hundred twenty (720) but less than seven hundred twenty-five (725) square miles and having a total assessed valuation in excess of Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00), but not more than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) according to the 1963 tabulation by the state tax commission and having a population according to the 1960 federal census in excess of sixty-five thousand (65,000) but less than seventy-five thousand (75,000), and any city, town, supervisor’s district, or other political entity created by the state located in whole or in part therein; and any county wherein there are located two county sites in one supervisor district, said county sites being in different judicial districts, and any city, town, supervisor’s district, or other political entity created by the state located in whole or in part therein.

“Convention center” shall include but not be limited to the following described facilities or land and the improvements thereon having the common objective of promoting conventions, tourism and trade within the State of Mississippi such as a coliseum, auditorium, pavilion, galleries, hotels, motels, restaurants, clubs and other facilities of similar nature and character.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-192; Laws, 1970, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 17-3-11.
Acquisition and use of land and other property for convention centers.

Every municipality is authorized to acquire by any available funds lands, either within or without municipal corporate limits, in fee or a lesser estate for the purpose of establishing thereon a convention center. Any lands previously acquired by a municipality and not needed for any other municipal purpose may also be used for establishing thereon a convention center. Lands may be acquired for the purpose herein authorized by purchase, lease, gift, devise, dedication or any other lawful manner.

A municipality, as it deems proper for the efficient and effective exercise of the powers and for the purposes defined under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19, may either acquire property, real or personal, and may use any municipal property, real or personal, not otherwise required for a municipal purpose, all as hereinafter provided.

The provisions of subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, every municipality is authorized to plan, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip and operate through the use of land and personal property as herein provided coliseums, amphitheaters, arenas, stadiums, auditoriums, pavilions, galleries or similar facilities to accommodate public meetings, gatherings, assemblies, conventions, or any like public gathering in which persons may lawfully assemble for a common lawful purpose, including but not limited to purposes which are in the nature of social, economic, political, religious, educational, cultural or entertainment and as members of a local, state of national economic, social, political or religious organization, or as members of the general public.

Every municipality is authorized to do and perform all acts and things necessary to accomplish the purposes of Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19, and, in addition to the power herein conferred with respect to the facilities authorized to be planned, established, developed, constructed, enlarged, improved, maintained, equipped or operated by the municipality, may convey, grant, bargain, sell, lease and deliver by contract or deed on such terms and conditions as it may deem proper such facilities to others and on such terms and conditions found and determined by the governing authority of the municipality to best promote conventions, tourism and trade the same as the powers herein authorized with respect to lands conveyed or leased to others upon which to operate hotels, motels, restaurants, clubs and other similar facilities and businesses, including, but not limited to, the granting of certain concessions therein or in the vicinity thereof such as advertising, car rental, and what is generally known as short order and/or souvenir concessions.

The power to use real or personal property authorized herein is hereby prohibited with respect to operation, maintenance, and engaging by a municipality in the business of hotels, motels, restaurants, clubs or any other business enterprises of similar nature and character, said uses being hereby expressly provided to be exercised only by private entrepreneurs on lease, grant or other conveyance of land and personal property by the municipality.

It is expressly provided that no municipality shall be authorized to operate a hotel, motel, restaurant, club or any other such facility for lodging, full-course meals, retail sales of goods, wares, merchandise or services, all of which are only authorized with respect to private entrepreneurs upon lands herein authorized to be either acquired or used by the municipality to be made available to such private entrepreneurs by the municipality as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-193; Laws, 1970, ch. 464, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 17-3-13.
Powers and immunities of municipalities acting under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19.

Any municipality undertaking to avail itself of the power and authority conferred by Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19 may sue and be sued; may, as hereinabove provided, defray the cost of the exercise of the power and authority conferred hereby with funds available to it as herein provided; may enter into leases or subleases for any period of time, as lessor or lessee or sublessor or sublessee of lands alone, or lands and facilities located thereon, whether the facilities are owned by the owner of the land, a lessee, sublessee or a third party and whether the municipality is a lessor, lessee or owner of the land. Any judgment, ex contractu or ex delicto, awarded against the municipality arising out of the exercise of the powers herein conferred shall be limited in levy and execution thereon to the assets held by the municipality by virtue of the power and authority of Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19.

Any municipality, as it deems proper for the efficient and effective exercise of the powers authorized under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19, may enter into contracts for any period of time, with any person, firm, corporation or other legal entity or governmental agency, either state or federal, and may borrow money when deemed necessary and proper for the efficient and effective exercise of the powers authorized under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19, but in so doing shall be prohibited from pledging the full faith and credit of the municipality. However, the revenues derived from the exercise of the powers authorized under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19 may be irrevocably pledged for the repayment of any money borrowed pursuant to the provisions hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-194; Laws, 1970, ch. 464, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 17-3-15.
Convention center bonds; general authority.

Any municipality is hereby authorized and empowered as it deems proper for the efficient and effective exercise of the powers authorized under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19, to borrow money and to issue revenue bonds therefor solely for the purposes specified in Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19 and by the procedure provided in Sections 21-27-41, 21-27-45, 21-27-47, 21-27-51 and 21-27-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, provided further that no bond issued pursuant to Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19, shall constitute an indebtedness of a municipality within the meaning of any statutory or charter restriction, limitation or provision as provided in said Sections 21-27-41 and 21-27-45, Mississippi Code of 1972; the bonds may be issued without having been first approved by an election upon the question of the issuance thereof; the bonds shall be sold in such manner and upon such terms as the governing authorities of the municipality shall determine but in no event shall the interest cost to maturity exceed eight per centum (8%) per annum; if serial bonds, such bonds shall mature annually, and the first maturity date thereof shall not be more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds; the bonds shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal and other taxation under the laws of the State of Mississippi with respect to both the principal and interest thereon and shall possess a status identical with bonds authorized by said Sections 21-27-41 and 21-27-45.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-195; Laws, 1970, ch. 464, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 17-3-17.
Receipt and disbursement of funds under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19.

Any municipality is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse, and expend federal and state monies and other monies, public or private, made available by grant or loan or both, to accomplish, in whole or in part, any of the purposes of Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19. All federal monies accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the municipality under such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with state law. All state monies accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the municipality upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-196; Laws, 1970, ch. 464, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).

§ 17-3-19.
Action by municipality under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19.

Unless otherwise provided therein, any action taken by any municipality under Sections 17-3-9 through 17-3-19 shall be taken by the governing body of that municipality in the manner otherwise provided by law for an act taken by that municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-197; Laws, 1970, ch. 464, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1970).